Hawaii, session 2025, HB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii has hundreds of unsolved murders, including some cases more than forty years old.  According to the nonprofit organization Project:  Cold Case, the State reported 2,182 homicides between 1965 and 2023, and 728 of those cases remain unsolved.  Native Hawaiian, Pacific Islander, and other Indigenous persons are disproportionately represented among homicide victims and missing persons cases, including unsolved "cold cases."  Nationally, the United States Department of Justice estimates that there are more than four thousand two hundred unsolved cases of missing and murdered Indigenous persons. The legislature recognizes that, while each county in the State has a cold case unit, additional resources and personnel may be needed to assist with the investigation of decades-old crimes.  The legislature also recognizes the value in coordinating efforts and sharing information among federal, state, tribal, and other agencies. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a cold case investigation unit within the department of the attorney general to assist federal, state, county, and tribal law enforcement, and other cold case units, in investigating unsolved homicide, missing person, and other cases that have a nexus to the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 28, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part .  COLD CASE INVESTIGATION UNIT §28- Cold case investigation unit.  (a)  There is established in the department of the attorney general a cold case investigation unit. (b)  The unit shall employ attorneys, investigators, and other personnel as necessary to promote the effective and efficient conduct of the unit's activities. Except for the attorneys, all other employees of the unit shall be subject to chapter 76. (c)  The purpose of the cold case investigation unit shall be to assist federal, state, county, and tribal law enforcement agencies, and cold case units within the office of a prosecutor, including law enforcement agencies and cold case units in other states, in investigating unsolved cases where the crime took place in this State or where the victim was a resident of this State. (d)  Cases investigated by the cold case unit may include unsolved homicides, sexual offenses, sexually motivated offenses, missing persons, and cases of unidentified remains; provided that the unit shall prioritize the investigation of cases having a Native Hawaiian, Pacific Islander, Native American, Native Alaskan, or other indigenous victim. (e)  The cold case investigation unit may accept investigation requests and may proactively offer assistance to a law enforcement agency or cold case unit; provided that the unit shall not assist with an active criminal investigation." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment and operation of a cold case investigation unit within the department of the attorney general. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________